intl/locales/hi/hyphenation/hyph_hi.dic
UTF-8
LEFTHYPHENMIN 2
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
2‍2
‌1
1अ1
1आ1
1इ1
1ई1
1उ1
1ऊ1
1ऋ1
1ॠ1
1ऌ1
1ॡ1
1ए1
1ऐ1
1ओ1
1औ1
ा1
ि1
ी1
ु1
ू1
ृ1
ॄ1
ॢ1
ॣ1
े1
ै1
ो1
ौ1
1क
1ख
1ग
1घ
1ङ
1च
1छ
1ज
1झ
1ञ
1ट
1ठ
1ड
1ढ
1ण
1त
1थ
1द
1ध
1न
1प
1फ
1ब
1भ
1म
1य
1र
1ल
1ळ
1व
1श
1ष
1स
1ह
2ँ
2ं
2ः
2ऽ
2॑
2॒
्2
